North Carolina, session 2025, SB832.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The following described property is removed from the corporate limits
of the City of Washington:

"Lying and being in the City of Washington, County of Beaufort, State of North Carolina and
more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at a Control Corner labeled B1 on the map referred to below. Said control corner
having North Carolina Grid Coordinates of N=666,344.07 and E=2,582,231.42 and running
thence from said beginning point so located the following courses and distances, North 35° 46'
30" East 128.65 feet to a point, thence North 84° 10' 28" East 59.63 feet to a point, thence South
63° 47' 08" East 56.33 feet to a point, thence North 19° 21' 41" East 223.92 feet to a point, thence
North 00° 55' 13" East 414.62 feet to a point, thence North 19° 42' 31" West 48.15 feet to a point,
thence North 55° 10' 39" West 44.75 feet to a point, thence North 87° 30' 41" West 288.92 feet
to a point, thence North 27° 03' 31" West 1,036.94 feet to a point, thence North 67° 05' 44" East
131.14 feet to a point, thence South 35° 17' 53" East 3.86 feet to a point, thence North 49° 51'
07" East 2.25 feet to a point, thence North 47° 57' 16" West 295.08 feet to a point, thence North
63° 37' 38" East 14.47 feet to a point in the Southern right-of-way line of Airport Road, thence
with the Southern right-of-way line of Airport Road, South 49° 49' 13" East 121.22 feet to a
point, thence South 51° 00' 29" East 101.41 feet to a point, thence South 56° 21' 17" East 76.97
feet to a point, thence South 61° 06' 31" East 92.61 feet to a point, thence South 66° 19' 34" East
83.55 feet to a point, thence South 71° 11' 39" East 88.68 feet to a point, thence South 73° 28'
33" East 152.89 feet to a point, thence South 73° 44' 12" East 128.90 feet to a point, thence South
73° 50' 07" East 148.39 feet to a point, thence South 73° 42' 27" East 120.39 feet to a point,
thence South 73° 37' 54" East 100.97 feet to a point, thence South 28° 19' 06" East 83.84 feet to
a point in the Western line of Market Street Extension, thence South 09° 24' 28" West 319.41
feet to a point, thence South 03° 03' 58" West 1,044.50 feet to a point, thence South 65° 06' 55"
West 2.27 feet to a point, thence South 65° 06' 55" West 392.70 feet to a point indicated by the
letter A1 on that certain survey referred to below, thence North 24° 53' 05" West 111.53 feet to
the Control Corner labeled B1 on the survey referred to below and this being all of that 18.93
acre tract or parcel of land as shown on that certain survey by Sorrell Land Surveying, Inc., dated
May 2, 2023. Reference is herein made to survey for a more complete and adequate description
of the subject property."
*S832-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. This act has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the City of
Washington for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date of
this act. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this act as
though the property were still within the corporate limits of the City of Washington.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective June 30, 2026. Property in the territory
described in this act as of January 1, 2026, is no longer subject to municipal taxes for taxes
imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 832-First Edition